Hawaii, session 2026, HB986.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the department of agriculture administers the pesticide use revolving fund to support the pesticide program's registration and licensing, certification and education, and compliance monitoring activities; to establish pesticide training workshops and educational programs, including, but not limited to, eradication and control programs for pests; and to develop integrated pest management strategies and various other services for pesticide users.  The legislature further finds that increasing the $1,000,000 ceiling on the fund would provide the department of agriculture an increased ability to fund technical pesticide projects, complete costly environmental studies, and generally enhance resources dedicated to pesticide compliance and enforcement and biosecurity. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to increase the ceiling on the pesticide use revolving fund to support the purposes of the pesticide use revolving fund. SECTION 2. Section 149A-13.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows: "(e) All unobligated, unencumbered, or unexpended funds remaining in the fund in excess of [$1,000,000] $3,000,000 at the close of each fiscal year shall lapse to the state general fund." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act, upon its approval, shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST